Washington statutes.
RCW 36.57.110

Boundaries of unincorporated transportation benefit areas.

The legislative body of any county is hereby authorized to create and define the boundaries of unincorporated transportation benefit areas within the unincorporated areas of the county, following school district or election precinct lines, as far as practicable. Such areas shall include only those portions of the unincorporated area of the county which could reasonably assume to benefit from the provision of public transportation services.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 270 s 10.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1975 1st ex.s. c 270: See notes following RCW 35.58.272.